tables/de-de-g1.ctb
# liblouis: German Grade 1 vollschrift Table
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the Linux console (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. All rights reserved.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation.  Please see the file COPYING for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# German vollschrift Braille Contraction Table
# Created by Tom Johnston <tom.johnston@accessabilityconsulting.co.uk>.

include de-de-g0.utb 

# the letter a

always au 16
word die\sAu 346-0-6-16
always Kapernaum 13-1-1234-12456-1345-1-136-134
always äu 34
always matthhäus 134-1-2345-2345-125-345-136-234

#the letter B

#the letter C
always ch 1456

#the letter d

#the letter e
always ei 146
word Ei 6-146
always reimport 1235-15-24-134-1234-26-2345
always koffein 13-135-124-124-15-24-1345
always eu 126
endword eum 15-136-134
midword eums 15-136-134-234

#the letter F

#the letter g

#the letter h

#the letter I
midendword ie 346
always daniel 145-1-1345-14-25-123
always gabriel 1245-1-12-1235-14-25-123
always lini 123-24-1345-24
always famili 124-1-134-24-123-24
always lili 123-24-123-24
always relief 1235-15-123-24-15-124
midendword iell 24-15-123-123
always requiem =
midendword ien 24-15-1345
begmidword bien 12-346-1345
begmidword dien 145-346-1345


#the letter j

#the letter k

#the letter l

#the letter m

#the letter n

#the letter o

#the letter p

#the letter q 

#the letter r

#the letter s
always sch 156
always eschatologie 15-234-1456-1-2345-135-123-135-1245-346
always st 23456
word st 234-2345
always ästhet 345-234-2345-125-15-2345
always asthma 1-234-2345-125-134-1
always esther 15-234-2345-125-15-1235
word wisst 2456-24-234-234-2345
endword stag 234-2345-1-1245
midendword stags 234-2345-1-1245-234
#always BUNDESTAG 12-136-1345-145-15-234-2345-1-1245

#the letter t

#the letter u

#the letter v

#the letter w

#the letter x

#the letter y

#the letter z

# Système International Prefixes
begword yotta 13456-135-2345-2345-1 10^24
begword zetta 1356-15-2345-2345-1 10^21
begword exa 15-1346-1 10^18
begword peta 1234-15-2345-1 10^15
begword tera 2345-15-1235-1 10^12
begword giga 1245-24-1245-1 10^9
begword mega 134-15-1245-1 10^6
begword kilo 13-24-123-135 10^3
begword hekto 125-15-13-2345-135 10^2
begword deka 145-15-13-1 10^1
begword dezi 145-15-1356-24 10^-1
begword zenti 1356-15-1345-2345-24 10^-2
begword milli 134-24-123-123-24 10^-3
begword mikro 134-24-13-1235-135 10^-6
begword nano 1345-1-1345-135 10^-9
begword piko 1234-24-13-135 10^-12
begword femto 124-15-134-2345-135 10^-15
begword atto 1-2345-2345-135 10^-18
begword zepto 1356-15-1234-2345-135 10^-21
begword yocto 13456-135-14-2345-135 10^-24
